Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-435
License; duration; issuance.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, licenses issued pursuant to the act shall expire one year after the date of issuance or on uniform annual dates established by the department.

(2) Licenses shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable. Licenses, license record information, and inspection reports shall be made available by the licensee for public inspection upon request and may be displayed in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 35.